Utah statutes.
62A-4a-401.   Legislative purpose.

It is the purpose of this part to protect the best interests of children, offer protective services to prevent harm to children, stabilize the home environment, preserve family life whenever possible, and encourage cooperation among the states in dealing with the problem of abuse or neglect.



Amended by Chapter 299, 2008 General Session

